Hawaii statutes.
§21D-5 Hawaii legislative publications
special fund; established. (a) There is established a Hawaii legislative
publications special fund within the treasury of the State into which shall be
deposited:

(1) All licensing fees or royalties derived from the
publication of the Hawaii Revised Statutes in electronic format;

(2) All appropriations made by the legislature to the
fund; and

(3) Any other proceeds derived from the publication
and use of other legislative publications and information services in an
electronic format.

All interest accrued by the revenues of the
fund shall become part of the fund.

(b) Moneys in the Hawaii legislative
publications special fund shall be used by the legislature to operate and
improve the computer and public access systems of the legislature.
Expenditures from the Hawaii legislative publications special fund shall be
authorized and disbursed through joint agreement of the president of the senate
and the speaker of the house of representatives.

(c) The Hawaii legislative publications
special fund shall not be subject to section 36-27, 36-30, or 37-53. [L 1996, c
174, §12; am L 2009, c 79, §§26, 34(3)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next